Massachusetts, session 194th, S414.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “district” the following
definition:-
“Local approval”, an action taken by a locally elected body to authorize local funds being
allocated for a charter school, which may be approved by the following actions: by the approval
of an elected school committee for each school district from which the charter school is expected
to enroll students, by the approval of voters at a town meeting of each of the towns from which
the charter school is expected to enroll students, or in the case of a city without an elected school
committee, by a vote of the city council, by whatever title it may be known, and the Mayor.
of 2

SECTION 2. Said section 89 of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding the foregoing, only commonwealth charter school applications that have
received the local approval of every town or school district expected to enroll students shall be
funded pursuant to the provisions of the section. Approval of an application by the board without
local approval shall be funded by the board, exclusive of Chapter 70 or other local funds.
Applications that have received the aforesaid local approval for a commonwealth charter school
shall comply with the provisions for such submission pursuant to the applicable provisions of the
section.
SECTION 3. This act shall apply only to commonwealth charter school applications
submitted after the date upon which the act becomes effective.
of 2